Washington statutes.
RCW 11.04.290

Vesting of title.

RCW 11.04.250 through 11.04.290 shall apply to community real property and also to separate estate; and upon the death of either spouse or either domestic partner, title of all community real property shall vest immediately in the person or persons to whom the same shall go, pass, descend or be devised, as provided in RCW 11.04.015, subject to all the charges mentioned in RCW 11.04.250.

[ 2008 c 6 s 930; 1965 c 145 s 11.04.290. Prior: 1895 c 105 s 5; RRS s 1370.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.